Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 15. Medical Review Panel

Former Article 15 was unconstitutional because it violated equal protection clause of state constitution.

It was not rationally related to protection of the public health or economic and social stability of the state. Also, the legislature's use of the law to protect one class of people from financial difficulties while it diluted the rights under the constitution of another class of people, could not be condoned. Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988)(decide under prior law).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “An Obstacle Course to Court: A First Look at Wyoming's Medical Review Panel Act,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 489 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Physician's tort liability for unauthorized disclosure of confidential information about patient, 48 ALR4th 668.

Res ipsa loquitur in negligent anesthesia cases, 49 ALR4th 63.

Future disease or condition, or anxiety relating thereto, as element of recovery, 50 ALR4th 13.

Liability of hospital or sanitarium for negligence of physician or surgeon, 51 ALR4th 235.

Medical malpractice: “loss of chance” causality, 54 ALR4th 10.

Right of voluntary disclosure of privileged proceedings of hospital medical review or doctor evaluation processes, 60 ALR4th 1273.

Medical malpractice: hospital's liability for injury allegedly caused by failure to have properly qualified staff, 62 ALR4th 692.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by activities of hospital “rescue team,” 64 ALR4th 1200.

Recovery in death action for failure to diagnose incurable disease which caused death, 64 ALR4th 1232.

Medical malpractice in performance of legal abortion, 69 ALR4th 875.

Medical malpractice: presumption or inference from failure of hospital or doctor to produce relevant medical records, 69 ALR4th 906.

Statute of limitations in wrongful death action based on medical malpractice, 70 ALR4th 535.

Right of tortfeasor initially causing injury to recover indemnity or contribution from medical attendant aggravating injury or causing new injury in course of treatment, 72 ALR4th 231.

Tort liability of medical society or professional association for failure to discipline or investigate negligent or otherwise incompetent medical practitioner, 72 ALR4th 1148.

Liability of osteopath for medical malpractice, 73 ALR4th 24.

“Dual capacity doctrine” as basis for employee's recovery for medical malpractice from company medical personnel, 73 ALR4th 115.

Validity and construction of state statute abrogating collateral source rule as to medical malpractice actions, 74 ALR4th 32.

Recoverability of compensatory damages for mental anguish or emotional distress for tortiously causing another's birth, 74 ALR4th 798.

Liability for medical malpractice in connection with performance of circumcision, 75 ALR4th 710.

Liability of hospital, physician or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper procedures during cesarean delivery, 76 ALR4th 1112.

Liability for dental malpractice in provision or fitting of dentures, 77 ALR4th 222.

Liability of chiropractors and other drugless practitioners for medical malpractice, 77 ALR4th 273.

Medical malpractice: measure and elements of damages in actions based on loss of chance, 81 ALR4th 485.

Liability of orthodontist for malpractice, 81 ALR4th 632.

Medical malpractice: drug manufacturer's package insert recommendations as evidence of standard of care, 82 ALR4th 166.

Malpractice involving hysterectomies and oophorectomies, 86 ALR4th 18.

Gynecological malpractice not involving hysterectomies or oophorectomies, 86 ALR4th 125.

Malpractice: physician's duty, under informed consent doctrine, to obtain patient's consent to treatment in pregnancy or childbirth cases, 89 ALR4th 799.

What patient claims against doctor, hospital or similar health care provider are not subject to statutes specifically governing actions and damages for medical malpractice, 89 ALR4th 887.

Application of “firemen's rule” to bar recovery by emergency medical personnel injured in responding to, or at scene of, emergency, 89 ALR4th 1079.

Hospital's liability for injury resulting from failure to have sufficient number of nurses on duty, 2 ALR5th 286.

Liability for incorrectly diagnosing existence or nature of pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 769.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to child caused by improper postdelivery diagnosis, care, and representations, 2 ALR5th 811.

Liability of physician, nurse, or hospital for failure to contact physician or to keep physician sufficiently informed concerning status of mother during pregnancy, labor and childbirth, 3 ALR5th 123.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by inadequate attendance or monitoring of patient during and after pregnancy, labor, and delivery, 3 ALR5th 146.

Liability of doctor or other health practitioner to third party contracting contagious disease from doctor's patient, 3 ALR5th 370.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper choice between, or timing of, vaginal or cesarean delivery, 4 ALR5th 148.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper procedures during vaginal delivery, 4 ALR5th 210.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper treatment during labor, 6 ALR5th 490.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother caused by improper postdelivery diagnosis, care, and representations, 6 ALR5th 534.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper diagnosis and treatment of mother relating to and during pregnancy, 7 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction and application of state statutory provisions limiting amount of recovery in medical malpractice claims, 26 ALR5th 245.

Medical malpractice: negligent catheterization, 31 ALR5th 1.

Medical malpractice liability of sports medicine care providers for injury to, or death of, athlete, 33 ALR5th 619.

Medical malpractice: physician's admission of negligence as establishing standard of care and breach of that standard, 42 ALR5th 1.

Medical malpractice in connection with diagnosis, care, or treatment of diabetes, 43 ALR5th 87.

Malpractice: Physician's liability for injury or death resulting from side effects of drugs intentionally administered to or prescribed for patient, 47 ALR5th 433.

Malpractice in diagnosis and treatment of male urinary tract and related organs, 48 ALR5th 575.

Liability of health maintenance organizations (HMOs) for negligence of member physicians, 51 ALR5th 271.

Malpractice in diagnosis or treatment of meningitis, 51 ALR5th 301.

Medical-malpractice countersuits, 61 ALR5th 307.

Physical injury requirement for emotional distress claim based on false positive conclusion on medical test diagnosing disease, 69 ALR5th 411.

Scope and extent of protection from disclosure of medical peer review proceedings relating to claim in medical malpractice action, 69 ALR5th 559.

§ 9-2-1501.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 92, § 1, and Laws 1988, ch. 89, § 206, also comprised a Medical Review Panel Act.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 4(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 9-2-1502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1504.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1505.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1506.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1507.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1508.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1509.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1510.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1511.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

§ 9-2-1512.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 2.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 4, provides that if 2005 House Bill 0083 was enacted into law,
§

9-2-1512

(b), as amended by section 1 of the act, deleting reference to the earmarked revenue fund, would not be effective, but if 2005 House Bill 0083 was not enacted into law, §.

9-2-1512

(b), as amended in section 1 of the act, would be effective. 2005 House Bill 0083 was enacted into law as Laws 2005, ch. 244, and thus the amendment to
§ 9-2-1512 by
Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, was not given effect.

§ 9-2-1513.
Short title. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1514.
Purpose of provisions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1515.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1516.
Service of pleadings; computation of time. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1517.
Panel created; compensation; director of panel; appointment and duties; rulemaking. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1518.
Claims to be reviewed by panel; prohibition on filing claims in court; tolling of statute of limitation; immunity of panel and witnesses; administration. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1519.
Claim review procedure; contents of claim; service of claim on provider; answer. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; 2010, ch. 81, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1520.
Panel composition; selection; disqualification of panelist; multiple defendants. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1521.
Hearing procedure; review of decision prohibited. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1522.
Panel deliberations and decision; decision not binding. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; 2010, ch. 81, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-2-1523.
Confidentiality of panel proceedings; privilege; proceedings and decision inadmissible; assessment of costs. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 244, § 1; 2010, ch. 81, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.